Idaho, session 2026, H0823.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 22-202A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-202A. DESIGNATION OF COUNTY FAIR BOARD AS ADVISORY BODY. (1) In
counties with a population of two hundred thousand (200,000) persons or
more, on or before January 1, 2024, the board of county commissioners may
provide by ordinance that the county fair board shall function as an advisory
board to the board of county commissioners. If such an ordinance is adopted,
the board of county commissioners shall retain and may exercise the powers,
duties, and responsibilities otherwise charged to the county fair board
by the provisions of this chapter. Any such ordinance shall set forth the
powers, duties, responsibilities, compensation, and terms of office of the
county fair board and may provide for any such other rules and regulations
under which the county fair board shall advise the board of county commis-
sioners and conduct its operations. Any such ordinance may be repealed at
any time, and if repealed, the provisions of this chapter shall apply as if no
such ordinance had been adopted.
(2) The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to:
(a) fair Fair districts in two (2) or more counties organized pursuant
to chapter 3, title 22, Idaho Code.; or
(b) Counties in which the population reached two hundred thousand
(200,000) persons or more after January 1, 2024.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.